Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-872
County; powers; supplementary.

The powers conferred in sections 39-860 to 39-870 are to be exercised without any restriction or limitation, and these powers are supplementary and additional to powers which have been or may hereafter be conferred upon any county, and are not a limitation to or in any way a restriction upon such county. The powers granted in said sections are in nowise a limitation upon, and the county is specifically authorized to put into effect any right or power which may be necessary for the proper conduct of its authority.

Laws 1941, c. 78, § 2, p. 319;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-2107;

R.S.1943, § 39-872.